Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 2
Public Employee Retirement Plans Generally

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

24-2-101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, which concerned retirement benefits during service in elective office, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 57, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 470, §§ 1, 2; 1979, No. 360, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2518.1, 12-2518.2.

Subchapter 2
— Investments

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977, No. 793, § 11, provided, in part, that after July 1, 1977 this subchapter would apply only to investments by boards of trustees of public employees' retirement systems of political subdivisions of the state and would not apply to the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the State Police Retirement System, and the Teacher Retirement System, since the investment provisions of chapter 3 of this title were intended to be the sole and exclusive method and procedure by which investments of the four named retirement systems may be made.

Cross References.

Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, investments, § 24-10-402.

Interest on investment of retirement funds, § 24-4-209.

Investment of local pension and trust funds, § 24-9-201 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1967, No. 70, § 3: Feb. 9, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to permit the various retirement systems of this State to have a broad range of available sources of investment of retirement funds, the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to permit the investment of such funds in Certificates of Deposit in banks of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 381, § 3: Mar. 12, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that flexibility in the investments available to the respective publicly-supported retirement systems in this State is essential to enable such retirement systems to obtain dependable income yields from investments; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to enable the Boards of Trustees of the retirement systems to invest funds in subordinated debt securities of federally insured savings and loan associations in this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 793, § 12: July 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of a uniform retirement policy for the State of Arkansas is essential to maintain employee morale and a stable and improved retirement system commensurate with the ability of the taxpayers of this State to finance, yet without jeopardizing retirement benefits of persons now employed by the State who do not elect to participate in the new retirement plan. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1977.”

Acts 1997, No. 554, § 5: Mar. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal soundness of the various retirement systems of cities and other political subdivisions of the state is vital to the operation of Arkansas' governments; that the proper fiscal management of public retirement systems promotes the goal of good government and provides public employees with an incentive to perform efficiently and effectively; and that any delay in implementing a policy of sound fiscal management with regard to retirement systems of cities and other political subdivisions of the state could result in a financial disaster for any marginally financed retirement system in Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-2-201. Permissible investments of political subdivision retirement funds.

The board of trustees of any public employee retirement system of any political subdivision of the State of Arkansas shall, from time to time, as funds are available for investment purposes, invest in obligations set out in this section.

The boards of trustees of public employees retirement systems of political subdivisions of the state shall have the power to invest and reinvest the moneys in their respective funds and to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any securities and investments held in the funds, except that the investments and reinvestments shall be limited to the following:

Direct general obligations of the United States Government;

Bonds, notes, debentures, or other obligations issued by an agency of the United States Government, the principal and interest of which are guaranteed in full by the United States Government;

Direct general obligations of the State of Arkansas;

Capital notes issued pursuant to § 23-32-215 [repealed] by banks and trust companies organized or operated under the laws of this state and subordinated debt securities of savings and loan associations in this state whose deposits are secured by the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation [abolished];

Certificates of deposit of any bank in Arkansas if the bank is insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

Revenue bonds issued by the University of Arkansas and by the other respective state-supported institutions of higher learning;

Ad valorem tax bonds of counties issued under the authority of the Arkansas Constitution, Amendments 10;

Ad valorem tax bonds of cities of the first and cities of the second class issued under the authority of the Arkansas Constitution, Amendments 10;

Valid warrants of local school districts of the State of Arkansas, but the warrants may be purchased only from the local school district board and only during the fiscal year in which issued;

Revolving loan bonds and revolving loan certificates of indebtedness held in the Revolving Loan Fund in the State Treasury under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Education;

Bonds of local school districts, sometimes referred to as “commercial bonds”, whereof a continuing ad valorem tax levy of a given number of mills on each dollar of the assessed valuation of all taxable real and personal property within the bounds of the district shall have been voted for the specific primary purpose of paying the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, as distinguished from the excess collections of taxes derived through levies made to pay other issues of bonds of the district;

First lien serial coupon bonds of local industrial development corporations organized under the authority of the Arkansas Industrial Development Act, § 15-4-101 et seq., but the bonds may be purchased only from the State Board of Finance;

Obligations consisting of notes, bonds, or debentures which are direct obligations of an industrial corporation, or a corporation engaged primarily in the production, transportation, distribution, or sale of electricity, gas, or water or the operation of telephone or telegraph systems, or any combination of them.

The obligor corporation shall be incorporated under the laws of the United States, any state, or the District of Columbia.

These obligations shall, at the time of purchase, be rated within the three (3) highest classifications by at least two (2) standard rating services.

Funds of the system may not be used in the purchase of common or preferred stocks, or of other equity capital, by whatever name called.

No such obligations as may be owned by the system may ever be exchanged for any stock or other equity capital; and

Notes secured by:

Mortgages on real estate, which are guaranteed as to payment of principal and interest either by the United States Government or an agency thereof; or

A corporation, approved by the Insurance Commissioner, which is licensed to do business in the State of Arkansas as an insurer.

Notes or obligations securing loans to Arkansas businesses made by banks and savings and loan associations pursuant to the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. § 631 et seq., only to the extent that both principal and interest are guaranteed by the United States Government.

The applicant bank or savings and loan association shall be required to enter into an indemnity agreement, which meets the approval of the board of trustees, to pay off the investments, together with interest and any unpaid costs and expenses in connection therewith, in the event the United States Government refuses to honor its guarantee.

The board of trustees may enter into conventional agreements for the servicing of the loans and the administration of receipts therefrom.

Any servicing agreement may contain such reasonable and customary provisions as the board of trustees may deem advisable and as may be agreed upon.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 509, §§ 1, 7; 1967, No. 70, § 1; 1975, No. 381, § 1; 1975, No. 839, § 1; 1977, No. 793, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2530, 12-2532n, 12-2536; Acts 1993, No. 403, § 15.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation referred to in this section was abolished by the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, Pub. L. No. 101-73. The responsibilities of the former entity have been largely assumed by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency.

Publisher's Notes.

Former § 23-32-215 was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 89, § 3. For current provisions, see § 23-48-315.

24-2-202. Procedure for purchase or sale of securities.

All securities purchased or sold by the board of trustees shall be upon sealed offers after publication of notice of proposal to purchase or sell, except securities provided for in § 24-2-201(b)(1), (2), (7), (8), (10), (11), and (12).

Not fewer than seven (7) days nor more than fourteen (14) days prior to the date set for the purchase of securities, the board of trustees shall cause a notice to be published by one (1) insertion, in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation throughout the state and in such other newspapers or financial journals as to it may appear desirable.

This notice shall request offers to sell such obligations to the system and state the approximate amount of funds proposed to be made available for the purpose and the time and place that the offers will be received.

On the date and on and after the time so fixed, the board of trustees, or a duly designated subcommittee thereof, shall open, read aloud, tabulate, and compare all the offers received; then, or within twenty-four (24) hours after the date and time so fixed, the board of trustees shall purchase or contract for the purchase of such of the obligations as, in its opinion, will serve the best interest of the retirement system.

All obligations of a particular type shall be purchased on the basis of the highest annual interest yield to the retirement system.

The board of trustees may reject any or all offers received and may waive informalities.

All obligations of a particular issue which are purchased by the board of trustees upon sealed offers shall be accompanied at the time of delivery and payment, by the opinion of recognized bond counsel acceptable to the board of trustees approving without qualification the validity of the issue of which the obligations are a part.

Direct general obligations of the United States and obligations of instrumentalities thereof may be purchased from the issuers from their duly designated fiscal agents or in the open market either with or without giving prior notice by publication of intention to purchase, all as, in the opinion of the board of trustees, will serve the best interest of the system.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 509, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2531.

24-2-203. First lien serial coupon bonds of local industrial development corporations.

Whenever mutually agreeable to the respective boards of trustees, the State Board of Finance may sell and the retirement systems may purchase first lien serial coupon bonds of local industrial development corporations.

Payment under any sale and purchase agreement may be effected in the State Treasury by charging the proper retirement fund with the purchase price thereof and by delivery of the securities to the custodian of the system.

In the event of default in payment of the principal of or interest on bonds of industrial development corporations, the State Board of Finance shall repurchase the obligations immediately after being called upon to do so by the system. The transaction may be effected in the State Treasury by crediting the retirement system fund with the purchase price thereof and by delivery of the securities to the custodian of securities for the State Board of Finance for credit of the par value thereof to the Securities Account.

The amount of the accrued interest due upon any repurchase or original sale shall be charged or credited, as the case may be, to the Securities Reserve Fund.

The sale and purchase price, and the resale and repurchase price, of first lien serial coupon bonds of industrial development corporations shall be the par value of those obligations, plus accrued interest.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 509, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2532.

24-2-204. Default in payment of principal or interest.

In the event of default in payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or other obligations held in the respective retirement funds, if the issuer of the obligations is a state-supported institution of higher learning, a county, a municipal corporation, including boards, commissions, or other authorities thereof, or a school district, the Treasurer of State shall withhold the amount of the default from any moneys in the State Treasury derived from general revenues on hand to the credit of, or held for the benefit of, the issuer and credit that amount, by transfer, to the retirement fund holding the obligations.

The State Treasury fund from which any transfer may be made shall be charged with the amount of the transfer.

The Treasurer of State shall furnish notification of the transfer, in writing, to the disbursing officer of the fund from which the transfer shall have been made.

Notification shall set forth the name of the issuer, the date, amount, and purpose of the charge.

The Treasurer of State shall thereafter cancel and deliver the obligations so retired to the designated paying agent.

No transfers may be made from moneys in any State Treasury fund which are derived from revenue either specifically or generally pledged to the payment of any issued and outstanding bonds.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 509, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2533.

24-2-205. Purchase of obligations not cancellation — Trust.

All obligations purchased or received shall be held in trust for the use and benefit of the system, which trust shall be subject only to the right of the board of trustees to sell or otherwise dispose of the obligations as provided in the various plans.

No purchase or receipt of obligations by a board of trustees shall ever be construed as a cancellation of the obligations so purchased or received.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 509, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2534.

24-2-206. Jurisdiction and custodianship of funds — Interest.

The various retirement system funds, as established in the State Treasury, are created and constituted trust funds.

All assets of the various funds, both cash and securities, shall be under the exclusive jurisdiction of the respective boards of trustees and shall be held by the Treasurer of State as custodian, subject to the orders and direction of the boards of trustees.

The interest received on all investments made from the trust funds shall be considered as trust fund income and shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the retirement system fund from which the investments were made.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 509, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2535.

24-2-207. Assets and income for retirement systems.

All assets and income of any retirement system of a city or other political subdivision of the State of Arkansas shall be held, invested, or disbursed for the exclusive purpose of providing for benefits, investment management, and administrative expenses and shall not be encumbered for or diverted to any other purposes.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 554, § 1.

Subchapter 3
— Correction of Erroneous Memberships

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 667, § 6: Apr. 10, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of individuals have been erroneously enrolled in the wrong State retirement system and that no statutory authority for correcting such erroneous enrollment exists. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 576, § 8: Mar. 26, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 667 of 1973 is unclear, that it has been interpreted in different ways, that it is creating unnecessary confusion and is causing hardships for members of the Public Employees Retirement System and the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 790, § 2: Apr. 3, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that legal retirement status of certain employees of the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services and the Division of Rehabilitation Services for the Blind who have been enrolled in the Non Contributory Plan of the Public Employees' Retirement System is in doubt, that the time for enrolling employees of these agencies in the Public Employees' Retirement System expired January 1, 1985, and that these agencies wish to continue to enroll new employees in the Non Contributory Plan of the Public Employees' Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 154, § 4: Feb. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the law providing for correction of erroneous enrollments in state retirement systems causes an undue hardship on some employees; that this Act is designed to alleviate that hardship by allowing the employee a choice. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 13, § 5: Feb. 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the law providing for correction of erroneous enrollments in state retirement systems causes an undue hardship on some employees; that this act is designed to alleviate that hardship by allowing the employees a choice. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 17: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility, death benefits, and disability benefits, and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 146, § 4: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are unclear regarding certain eligibility and benefit requirements; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 2190, § 24: Apr. 13, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the services of the county boards of education are no longer needed by the school districts; that there will be no funding available for the operation of the county boards of education; and that this act is immediately necessary because county boards of education need sufficient authority to transfer functions, duties, and records prior the end of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-2-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Eligible retirement system” means the retirement system in which the employee is eligible for membership;

“Employer” means an employing state agency or an employing school district; and

“Retirement system of record” means the system that holds an erroneous membership.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 667, § 1; 1979, No. 576, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2571.

24-2-302. Classification of members.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this subchapter, all employees of the State of Arkansas or any of its political subdivisions who are members or become members of a state retirement system shall be members of the retirement system indicated in this section as follows:

All eligible employees of the Arkansas Department of Transportation shall be members of the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System;

All eligible employees of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be members of the State Police Retirement System;

The following persons shall be members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System:

Any person employed by a school for the purpose of giving instruction and whose employment requires state certification;

Any other person employed by a school in a regular or special position;

Any person employed by any of the following organizations or agencies:

Arkansas School for the Blind;

Arkansas School for the Deaf;

Arkansas Activities Association;

A local school board;

State Board of Education;

Regional education service cooperatives; and

Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

Any person employed in a position requiring professional training or certification with an area vocational-technical school or employed by the Arkansas Educational Television Commission, except that employees of area vocational-technical schools and the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section, and the Office of Skills Development, who have elected to participate in an alternate retirement plan established by §§ 24-7-901 and 24-7-903 — 24-7-908 shall be active members of the alternate retirement plan; and

Any person employed in a position requiring professional training or certification with Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, the Division of State Services for the Blind, or the Division of Youth Services except those employees who have elected coverage under § 24-4-101 et seq.

Membership of employees of Arkansas Rehabilitation Services and the Division of State Services for the Blind shall be subject to the following conditions:

Those employees who were employed before January 1, 1985, and who were members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System on that date shall continue to be members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, except that in the event the time limit for those employees to change to the noncontributory plan of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System under § 24-4-522 is extended beyond January 1, 1985, those employees shall have the maximum time allowed by law to elect to make the change;

Those employees who were employed before January 1, 1985, and who are members of the noncontributory plan of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System on that date shall continue to be members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

Persons whose initial employment by either Arkansas Rehabilitation Services or the Division of State Services for the Blind is on or after January 1, 1985, shall be members of the noncontributory plan of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

All eligible employees of the State of Arkansas or any of its political subdivisions except those who are members of another legally established state retirement plan shall be members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 667, § 2; 1979, No. 576, § 2; 1985, No. 790, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2572; Acts 1999, No. 325, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 1; 2005, No. 146, § 1; 2005, No. 2190, § 22; 2007, No. 617, § 43; 2017, No. 707, §
267; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2359-2361.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 574, § 1, effective July 1, 1993, transferred the Division of Rehabilitation Services of the Department of Human Services to the Division of Vocational and Technical Education of the Department of Education, and renamed the division as the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services.

Acts 1997, No. 803, effective March 25, 1997, created the Department of Workforce Education, abolished the Division of Vocational and Technical Education of the Department of Education, and transferred the Arkansas Rehabilitation Services to the Department of Workforce Education.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (2); substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education, Adult Education Section of the Division of Workforce Services, and the Office of Skills Development” for “Department of Career Education” in (3)(D); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Career Education” following “Arkansas Rehabilitation Services of the” in (3)(E)(i).

Cross References.

Conversion from contributory to noncontributory plan, § 24-3-215.

24-2-303. Erroneous enrollment before January 1, 1979.

Any employee who was erroneously enrolled in a state retirement system before January 1, 1979, and whose contributions have not been refunded prior to March 26, 1979, shall continue to be a member of the retirement system of record.

The member shall receive service credit for all paid membership service in the retirement system, shall be entitled to any free service which was credited to the member prior to March 26, 1979, or which is creditable to the member under existing laws, and shall also be entitled to reciprocal service credits as provided by §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405 and 24-2-407.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 667, § 3; 1979, No. 576, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2573; Acts 2001, No. 151, § 2.

24-2-304. Erroneous enrollment on or after January 1, 1979.

When it is discovered by an employee, employer, or a state retirement system that an employee became erroneously enrolled in a state retirement system on or after January 1, 1979, the employee may elect to remain a member of the retirement system of record or may become a member of the eligible retirement system.

Subsections (b)-(d) of this section shall apply if the member chooses to become a member of the eligible retirement system.

The retirement system of record shall refund to the employer all contributions, both employee and employer, that were made in behalf of the employee in question.

The employer shall retain the contributions of both the employee and the employer that are refunded under subsection (b) of this section until the member is enrolled in the eligible retirement system.

Upon receipt of the refunded contributions, the employer shall file with the eligible retirement system an application for membership by the employee and a history of covered employment and wages, including service refunded by the retirement system of record.

The eligible retirement system shall furnish to both the employee and the employer a statement of the amount of contributions necessary to establish service credit in the eligible retirement system for the service refunded by the retirement system of record.

In computing the cost of that service, the eligible retirement system shall include both employee and employer contribution rates in its computation.

In paying the cost of establishing credit for the service in the eligible retirement system, the employer shall first use the employee refund from the retirement system of record and then as much of the employer refund as may be necessary. However, if all of the employer refund is not required to establish service credit, the remaining amount shall be paid into the General Education Fund.

In the event the cost of establishing the service credit is in excess of both the employee and the employer contributions refunded by the retirement system of record, the excess amount shall be paid by the employee.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 667, § 4; 1979, No. 576, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2574; Acts 1989, No. 154, § 1; 1991, No. 13, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1979, No. 576, § 5, provided that if, on March 26, 1979, the retirement system of record had refunded the contributions of a member who was erroneously enrolled, but service credit had not yet been established in the eligible retirement system, the service credit was to be granted by the eligible retirement system as provided by this subchapter. Otherwise, all proceedings to correct memberships of employees who were erroneously enrolled before January 1, 1979 were cancelled.

24-2-305. Effect of promotion of nonteacher school employee.

Other provisions of this subchapter to the contrary notwithstanding, a school janitor, bus driver, or cafeteria worker who is enrolled in one (1) of those positions as a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and later is promoted to a position as school maintenance worker or supervisor, as bus mechanic or as transportation supervisor, or as cafeteria manager, respectively, shall continue to be a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as long as he or she is employed in one (1) of those respective capacities.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 576, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2574.1.

24-2-306. Erroneous enrollment because of concurrent membership.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who is erroneously enrolled in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System because of concurrent enrollment in another state-funded or state-authorized retirement system, other than Social Security, due to separate and distinct service for a public school or a municipality, may elect to remain a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System subject to the following conditions:

The other system will allow the member to forfeit the concurrent service by refunding all employer and employee contributions respectively; and

The member notifies both the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the other system that the member will remain in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and forfeit service and accrued benefits in the other system.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 2.